Utah statutes.
17-27a-519.   Licensing of residences for persons with a disability.

The responsibility to license programs or entities that operate facilities for persons with a disability, as well as to require and monitor the provision of adequate services to persons residing in those facilities, shall rest with:

(1)  for programs or entities licensed or certified by the Department of Human Services, the Department of Human Services as provided in Title 62A, Chapter 5, Services for People with Disabilities; and

(2)  for programs or entities licensed or certified by the Department of Health, the Department of Health under Title 26, Chapter 21, Health Care Facility Licensing and Inspection Act.



Amended by Chapter 309, 2013 General Session

